California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Every container of milk, cream, or any product of milk or cream which is delivered to the consumer by any retailer or distributor and which is to be returned to such retailer or distributor shall be rinsed and drained before it is returned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34623.

Every container, except a single service container, of any kind in which milk or any product of milk is kept, stored, transported, or delivered, shall be sound, smooth, free from rust or open seams, and at all times kept in a condition which shall permit thorough cleansing of all surfaces with which the milk or its products come in contact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34624.

Any container, including any ice cream cabinet, which is commonly used or intended for the reception, storage, or delivery of milk, cream, or any product of milk or cream shall be used exclusively for the storage and use of milk and milk products. It shall not be used for any other purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34625.

Any empty container which is delivered to any producer, manufacturer, retailer, or distributor for the reception of milk or any product of milk shall be kept in a clean, sanitary, and sterile condition. It shall not be used for any other purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34626.

Every receptacle, except a single service container, which is used to contain market milk, skim milk, buttermilk, or cultured buttermilk for sale or disposal to the retail trade, shall be properly washed and sterilized on the premises where it is filled, in a separate room which is designed and equipped for such washing and sterilizing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34627.

A single service container shall be made of sanitary material, in a sanitary manner, and shall be kept in a sanitary condition free from contamination until it is actually filled with milk, skim milk, buttermilk, or cultured buttermilk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34628.

Market milk, skim milk, buttermilk, or cultured buttermilk for sale or disposal to the retail trade shall not be transferred from one receptacle to another upon any highway, any street or sidewalk, or upon any vehicle or in any place except a milk room as specified in Section 34591 or in a place where such product is served for consumption on the premises.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Violations [34651. - 34655.]

34651.

It is unlawful for any person to use the words “Registered in California” or the abbreviation “Reg. Cal.” on any container, cabinet, or other equipment unless the brand which appears upon it is registered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34652.

It is unlawful for any person without the written consent which is provided for in Section 34562, except the registrant of the brand and the members of any association which is the registrant, to use or fill with milk or any product of milk, any container, cabinet, or other dairy equipment, which is marked or distinguished with a brand, of which a description has been filed and published.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34653.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Erase, obliterate, cover up, or conceal any brand without first notifying the director and receiving his approval.

(b) Sell, buy, give, take, or otherwise traffic in such containers, cabinets, or other dairy equipment, except as provided in Section 34562.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34654.

It is unlawful for any common carrier or private carrier for hire, except those which are engaged in transporting milk, cream, and containers of milk and cream to and from dairy farms, to receive or transport any empty container, cabinet, or other equipment which is marked with a brand registered pursuant to this chapter unless such carrier has in its possession a bill of lading or invoice which shows all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the consignor.

(b) The name and address of the consignee.

(c) The number of containers, cabinets, or other equipment and the brand which appears upon them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34655.

A consignee shall not accept or receive any empty container, cabinet, or other equipment which he is not authorized to use. Nothing herein shall be construed to derogate from any powers or authority of the Public Utilities Commission of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Condemnation [34681. - 34681.]

34681.

Any container which is found to have been used in violation of the requirements of this code shall be condemned and marked with the word “condemned” in any appropriate manner. Such a container shall not be used again in connection with the handling of milk or any product of milk for human consumption, until it has been cleaned or repaired in a manner which is acceptable to the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Transportation [34801. - 34806.]

34801.

Every carrier of milk, cream, or any product of milk, whether a producer, gratuitous private carrier, private carrier for hire, or common carrier, shall maintain every conveyance which it uses in transporting milk and cream in a clean and sanitary condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34802.

Every conveyance, while transporting milk or cream or any clean empty container which is intended for milk or cream, and any shipping platform or premises where any such container is held while waiting shipment, shall either be enclosed or provided with a canvas covering or otherwise afforded protection from the direct rays of the sun, from warm air, dust, mud, rain, and other sources of contamination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34803.

Milk, cream, or any product of milk or cream shall not be transported in connection with, or close to, any other commodity from which it may absorb any foreign flavor or which may contaminate it. Milk, cream, or any empty container which is used for milk or cream shall not be hauled in any vehicle which is used for hauling manure or garbage or in any other unclean conveyance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34804.

Every milk or cream can or other shipping container for any product of milk shall be handled carefully and, while it contains milk, cream, or other product of milk, shall be kept right end up.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34805.

Nothing herein shall be construed to derogate from any powers or authority of the Public Utilities Commission of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967.   Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34806.

A carrier of milk, cream, or any product of milk, whether a gratuitous private carrier, private carrier for hire, or common carrier, shall not receive or transport any milk, cream, or product of milk after notification by the director or an approved milk inspection service that such product is unclean, polluted, tainted, unwholesome, stale, impure, or adulterated, or has been produced in violation of any provision of this code, except as provided for in Section 32764.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Licenses, Records, and Reports [34951. - 35252.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [34951. - 34952.]

34951.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34952.

“Milk products plant license” means a license which is issued by the director pursuant to Section 35015 for a milk products plant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 423, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [34981. - 34981.]

34981.

Every license which is issued pursuant to this chapter, while in force, shall be kept conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the party to whom it has been issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensing of Milk Products Plants and Other Places of Business [35011. - 35019.]

35011.

A person shall not engage in any of the following businesses unless he has obtained a license from the director for each separate milk products plant or place of business:

(a) Dealing in, receiving, manufacturing, freezing, or processing milk, or any product of milk.

(b) Manufacturing, freezing, or processing imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35012.

An application for a milk products plant license shall be made on a form which is prescribed by the director. It shall state all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) The address of the milk products plant.

(c) Such other information as to the nature of the applicant’s business as the director may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35013.

Each application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount which is established for the particular license by Section 35221.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

35014.

Upon receipt of an application for a milk products plant license, the director shall investigate the equipment and the sanitary condition of the milk products plant for which the application for a license has been made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35015.

If the condition of the milk products plant is found to be satisfactory, a milk products plant license shall be issued by the director to the applicant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35016.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any hotel, restaurant, food facility, boardinghouse, hospital, or other concern or agency that manufactures a product of milk for the use of, or purchase by, any patron, guest, patient, or employee shall obtain a milk products plant license.

(b) (1) A hotel, restaurant, food facility, boardinghouse, hospital, or other concern or agency that manufactures hard frozen or semifrozen dairy products, or hard frozen or semifrozen nondairy desserts, for the use of, or purchase by, any patron, guest, patient, or employee shall obtain a limited frozen manufacturing permit from the secretary.

(2) The permit may be issued only after the secretary
 determines that the facility is suitable for manufacturing those products.

(3) A permit issued pursuant to this subdivision may be renewed annually, if the facility is found by the secretary, based on an onsite evaluation, to be in compliance with the conditions specified in subdivision (c).

(c) A hotel, restaurant, food facility, boardinghouse, hospital, or other concern or agency issued a limited frozen manufacturing permit pursuant to this section shall meet all of the following standards:

(1) The hard frozen and semifrozen products manufactured shall only be sold directly to purchasers on the premises of the permitted facility for the purpose of consumption. A hard frozen or semifrozen product manufactured pursuant to the limited frozen manufacturing permit shall not be sold for wholesale or resale.

(2) All dairy ingredients used in the manufacture of hard frozen and semifrozen products shall have been prepasteurized at a licensed milk products plant. The receiving, processing, use, or handling of raw dairy ingredients is not permitted in a facility issued a limited frozen manufacturing permit.

(3) Adequate facilities, consistent with recognized good manufacturing practices for the manufacture of hard frozen and semifrozen dairy products, as determined by the secretary, shall be provided as a condition of the limited frozen manufacturing permit. The facilities shall include, but not be limited to, adequate utensil and container washing, sanitization and storage, and sufficient sanitary work areas, including handwashing facilities, dedicated to the manufacture of hard frozen and semifrozen dairy products or hard frozen and semifrozen nondairy desserts. Sanitation standards
 consistent with good manufacturing and handling practices for retail food establishments in conformance with Part 117 (commencing with Section 117.1) of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be utilized by the secretary as a condition for issuance and renewal of the limited frozen manufacturing permit.

(4) The hotel, restaurant, boardinghouse, hospital, or other concern or agency shall not manufacture more than 7,500 gallons of hard frozen or semifrozen dairy products and hard frozen and semifrozen nondairy desserts during any year. Records documenting the volume of production of these hard frozen and semifrozen products manufactured during the preceding 12-month period shall be maintained at a facility issued a limited frozen manufacturing permit and shall be available for inspection by the secretary.

(5) Hard frozen dairy products or nondairy frozen desserts
 manufactured at a facility issued a limited frozen manufacturing permit may be packaged exclusively for sale on the premises to patrons and guests. Packaging of frozen or semifrozen products for purposes of wholesale, resale, or for sale off the premises of the facility is prohibited. All packaged products shall be labeled with the manufacturer’s name, address, and limited frozen manufacturing permit number and comply with all applicable food labeling provisions of state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 76.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35017.

This article does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any private home that is manufacturing for its own use.

(b) Any retailer that is dealing in finished products which are received from a distributor or producer in final form.

(c) Any producer that is selling milk and cream exclusively at wholesale for manufacturing, freezing, or processing milk and milk products.

(d) Any producer whose business consists exclusively of producing and distributing raw market milk produced by such producer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35018.

Every milk products plant license expires at the end of each calendar year, but shall remain in force during the month of January of the next succeeding year or such part of the month as may be necessary for the renewal of such license by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35019.

Any license may be renewed each successive year, if the plant for which a previous license was issued and the business of such plant has been conducted in accordance with the requirements of this division during the year next preceeding that for which the renewal is requested. The correct amount of the fee for the renewal of the license shall be forwarded with the application for renewal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Diabetic and Dietetic Frozen Milk Products Licenses [35041. - 35042.]

35041.

A person shall not engage in the business of manufacturing any diabetic or dietetic frozen milk product or mix unless, in addition to a milk products license, such person has obtained and holds a diabetic or dietetic frozen milk products license from the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35042.

Each application for a license to engage in the business of manufacturing any diabetic or dietetic frozen milk product or mix shall be accompanied by a statement which describes the method and manner by which the product is made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Modified Milk, Modified UHT Milk, and Modified UHT Cream Licenses [35071. - 35072.]

35071.

A person shall not engage in the business of manufacturing, preparing, or processing modified UHT milk, modified UHT cream or modified milk unless, in addition to the milk products plant license, the person has obtained and holds a modified milk license, modified UHT milk license, or a modified UHT cream license, as the case may be, from the director.

Separate licenses are required for modified milk, modified UHT milk, and modified UHT cream.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

35072.

Upon receipt of an application for a modified milk license, modified UHT milk license, or modified UHT cream license, the director shall investigate the equipment and sanitary conditions of the place where the modified milk, modified UHT milk, or modified UHT cream is to be manufactured or prepared, and provide the applicant with a copy of the laws of the state which pertain to the product. If the condition of the place is found to be satisfactory, and the special fee for the license which is prescribed by Section 35225 is paid by the applicant, the license shall be issued. A modified milk license, modified UHT milk license, or modified UHT cream license shall normally expire on the 31st day of December of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 5.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Oleomargarine and Imitation Ice Cream Licenses [35101. - 35103.]

35101.

It is unlawful for any person, unless he has a license to do so, to engage in the business of manufacturing, freezing, or processing any of the following:

(a) Oleomargarine, or margarine, colored oleomargarine or colored margarine, renovated butter, or a substitute for butter.

(b) Imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

35102.

A person shall first apply each year to the director for a license to engage in any business or occupation for which a license is required by Section 35101. Upon payment of the license fee which is prescribed in Section 35226, the director shall issue a license to engage in the business for which the license is issued. Separate licenses are required for each such business or occupation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35103.

Every license which is issued pursuant to Section 35102 expires on June 30th of each year, and may be issued in periods of one year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Butter Permits and Licenses [35131. - 35137.]

35131.

A person shall not engage in the business of cutting and wrapping butter unless such person, in addition to the milk products plant license, has a butter cutting and wrapping permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35132.

Every person that distributes butter which is received in packaged form direct from out-of-state points shall obtain a butter distributor’s permit from the director for each plant or place of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35133.

Every butter cutting and wrapping permit and butter distributor’s permit expires at the end of each calendar year. A permit may be renewed each successive year, if the plant for which the previous permit was issued and the business has been conducted in accordance with the requirements of this division during the year next preceding that for which renewal is requested.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35134.

Every person who is in charge of cutting, wrapping, packaging, or distributing butter, or any supervisor of any such person who is responsible for the grading of butter, shall obtain and hold a butter grader’s license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35135.

Application for such license shall be made to the director who shall examine each applicant as to his qualifications and knowledge of butter grades and of the law applicable to him. The fee for a butter grader’s license shall accompany the application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35136.

Every butter grader’s license expires on the 31st day of December. It may be renewed by payment of the renewal fee for a butter grader’s license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35137.

The licensing provisions of this article also apply to butter which is received in package form from out-of-state points.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Licensing of Testers, Samplers and Weighers, Technicians, and Pasteurizers [35161. - 35171.]

35161.

Every person who tests milk, cream, or any fluid derivative of milk or cream, which is purchased, received, or sold on the basis of milk fat which is contained in it, shall hold a tester’s license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35162.

Methods or processes of testing shall be approved by the director. A separate license is required for each of the methods or processes of testing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35163.

Every person, except a licensed tester, who takes any sample of milk, cream, or any fluid derivative of milk or cream, which is purchased, received, or sold on the basis of milk fat which is contained in it, on which sample tests are to be made as a basis of payment, and every person who weighs or measures milk, cream, or any fluid derivative of milk or cream, shall hold a sampler’s and weigher’s license if the weight or measure is to be used as the basis of payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35164.

If one person does both sampling and weighing or measuring, only one license is required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35166.

Any person who takes any sample of milk, cream, or any fluid derivative of milk or cream for testing shall hold the sample in an unchanged condition until it is delivered to a licensed tester.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35167.

Every person who makes any bacteriological determination of milk or cream which is to be used as a basis of payment or determining value shall hold a technician’s license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35168.

Every person who operates any equipment wherein milk or any product of milk is pasteurized shall hold a pasteurizer’s license. The pasteurizer’s licenses shall be known as general and limited licenses. The general license shall apply to pasteurization by all of the approved methods or processes of pasteurization, and the limited license shall apply only to the pasteurization by the process or method known as the holding or vat method.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35169.

Every person who tests any milk or cream purchased, received, or sold on the basis of the nonfat milk solids contained in it shall hold a nonfat milk solids tester’s license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35170.

An application for a tester's, sampler’s and weigher's, technician's, pasteurizer's, or nonfat milk solids tester’s license shall be made to the director. The director shall examine each applicant for the license that is applied for as to the applicant’s qualifications and knowledge of the law applicable to him. Each application shall be accompanied by the fee which is prescribed for the license by Section 35231.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35171.

Every license that is issued pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 35131) and this article expires two years from the date of issue. License renewal fees must be received within 90 days of the license expiration date for renewals to be issued. Each licensee required to be licensed pursuant to Section 35163 must, within six months prior to the expiration of the license, successfully complete a refresher course and proficiency evaluation acceptable to the secretary. Licenses may then be renewed for two-year periods upon payment of the fee which is prescribed by Section 35231.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Reports and Records [35191. - 35196.]

35191.

Every person that manufactures or imports any oleomargarine or margarine, or any substance designed as a substitute for butter, or that resembles butter, which is not made wholly from pure milk or cream, or any product resembling a milk product, shall keep a record, which gives the quantity that is sold or purchased, the name and location of the seller and purchaser, the date, and the place to which it was shipped or delivered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

35193.

All records which are required to be kept by Sections 35191 and 35192 shall, at all times during business hours, be open to the inspection of the director, any officer of any city or county board of health, and any peace officer of any city or county of the state. A failure to keep any of the records which are required to be kept or a failure to permit any authorized inspection of such records is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35195.

Every manufacturer of oleomargarine shall submit to the director at the end of each month a report of the amount of oleomargarine which such person sold or distributed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35196.

Every person that holds a butter cutting and wrapping permit or a butter distributor’s permit shall, on or before the fifth day of those months in which a fee is due pursuant to Section 35227 or 35228, file with the director a statement which shows the exact number of pounds of butter cut, wrapped, packaged, or distributed by such person during the preceding three months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Fees [35221. - 35231.]

35221.

(a) Every person that is engaged in the business of dealing in, receiving, manufacturing, freezing, or processing ice cream, ice milk, sherbet, or any similar frozen product, of manufacturing, freezing, or processing imitation ice cream, imitation ice milk, or any similar frozen product, or of processing any other dairy product for which a license is required, shall pay the following fees:

(1) For a license for all frozen milk products and all imitation frozen milk products, one hundred dollars ($100) for the calendar year for which the license is issued. The fee for the renewal of this license is one hundred dollars ($100), plus one dollar ($1) for each additional 10,000 gallons or fraction of 10,000 gallons over and above 20,000 gallons that were manufactured
 during the preceding year, ending December 31.

(2) For a semifrozen (soft-serve) milk products plant license issued to persons making application under Section 33704, three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325) for the calendar year for which the semifrozen (soft-serve) milk products plant license is issued. The fee for the renewal of this license is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).

(3) For a limited frozen manufacturing permit issued to a hotel, restaurant, food facility, boardinghouse, hospital, or other concern or agency pursuant to Section 35016, six hundred dollars ($600) for the initial permit. The fee for the annual renewal of this permit shall be six hundred dollars ($600).

(4) For a person, except a hospital or sanitarium, that is engaged in the business of manufacturing any diabetic or dietetic frozen
 milk product or mix, one hundred dollars ($100) for the calendar year for which a diabetic or dietetic frozen milk products license is issued. The fee for the renewal of this license is one hundred dollars ($100).

(5) For any other product for which a license is required, one hundred dollars ($100) for the calendar year for which the license is issued. The fee for the renewal of this license is one hundred dollars ($100), plus one dollar ($1) for each additional 10,000 pounds or fraction of 10,000 pounds over and above the first 100,000 pounds of milk fat that was purchased or received during the preceding year, ending December 31.

(b) The license and permit fees required by this section shall be prorated on a quarterly basis for any licensee or permittee that commences operations after the first quarter in any calendar year, regardless of whether or not the milk products plant
 was licensed or permitted during the preceding calendar year.

(c) Notwithstanding the license and permit fees specified in this section, the secretary may increase the fees by an amount no more than 3 percent per annum, not to exceed the reasonable costs of services provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 77.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35225.

The special fee for a modified milk license, modified UHT milk license, or modified UHT cream license is one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 6.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

35226.

The fee for issuing the license required by Section 35101 for any manufacturer or processor within this state is one hundred dollars ($100) annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 715.)
-------------------------------------------

35227.

Every permittee that is engaging in the business of cutting and wrapping butter shall pay a fee of one dollar ($1), plus twenty cents ($0.20) for each 1,000 pounds, or part of 1,000 pounds, over and above the first 5,000 pounds of butter which such person cut and wrapped during each of the three-month periods ending February 28th, May 31st, August 31st, and November 30th. Such fees shall be paid to the director during the first week of March, June, September, and December, respectively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35228.

Every person that has a permit to engage in the business of distributing butter shall pay a fee of one dollar ($1), plus twenty cents ($0.20) for each 1,000 pounds, or part of 1,000 pounds, over and above the first 5,000 pounds of butter which such person distributed during each of the three-month periods ending February 28th, May 31st, August 31st, and November 30th. Such fees shall be paid to the director during the first week of March, June, September, and December, respectively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35229.

The fees which are required by Sections 35227 and 35228 do not apply to United States government owned butter which is cut and wrapped in this state or to butter which is cut and wrapped in this state for export to points outside the continental United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35231.

The initial and renewal fees for a tester’s, sampler’s and weigher’s, technician’s, pasteurizer’s, and butter grader’s license are as follows:

(a) For a tester’s license, including a nonfat milk solids tester, one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) For a sampler’s and weigher’s license, one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) For a limited sampler’s and weigher’s license, seventy-five dollars ($75).

(d) For a technician’s license, one hundred dollars ($100).

(e) For a pasteurizer’s license, one hundred dollars ($100).

(f) For a butter grader’s license, one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 21.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Disposition of Funds [35251. - 35252.]

35251.

The director, at least once each month, shall report to the Controller the total amount of any money which is collected under Section 35221. He or she shall, at the same time, pay into the State Treasury the entire amount of the receipts which shall be credited to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and expended as provided in Section 32704.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.

The director shall, at least once each month, report to the State Controller the total amount of any money which is collected for fees under Sections 35227 and 35228. He shall, at the same time, pay into the State Treasury the entire amount of such receipts which shall be credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund and expended in carrying out the provisions of this division relating to butter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Penalties [35281. - 35312.]



  ARTICLE 1. Criminal Penalties [35281. - 35283.]

35281.

Any violation of any provision of this division, or the regulations for its enforcement, is a misdemeanor. Unless a different penalty is specifically prescribed, it is punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not less than 10 days nor more than 90 days, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 118.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

35282.

Offering physical resistance or bodily attack on authorized representatives of the department or of an approved milk inspection service, who are engaged in the proper conduct of their official duties, is a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days, without the alternative of a fine in any case.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35283.

Notwithstanding Sections 35281 and 35282, any person who intentionally commits any of the following acts is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment of not less than six months nor more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment:

(a) Processing without pasteurization any milk or milk product which is required by this division to be pasteurized.

(b) Manufacturing or processing for resale of any milk or milk product in a milk products plant which is not licensed by the director pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 34951).

(c) Providing milk or milk products to any person for the manufacturing or processing for resale of any milk or milk product unless that person is licensed by the director pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 34951).

(d) Falsifying any records which are required by Sections 34007, 34064, and 34065.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1166, Sec. 7.   Effective September 28, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Civil Penalties [35311. - 35312.]

35311.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a penalty of 25 percent or five dollars ($5), whichever is greater, shall be added to any portion of the fee for renewal of any license which is required by this division which is not paid by the last day of the month following that in which the preexisting license expired.

A penalty shall not accrue if the licensee operates only seasonally and he has not engaged in the activities for which the license is required between the time his preexisting license expired and the date of the renewal of his license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35312.

To the amount of any fee, except a license fee, which is required by this division, that is not paid by the last day of the month following that in which due, there shall be added a penalty of 25 percent of the unpaid amount of such fee, or five dollars ($5), whichever is greater, for each month or fraction of a month until the entire fee and penalty are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. MILK AND CREAM [35601. - 36331.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [35601. - 35631.]



  ARTICLE 1. Milk [35601. - 35603.]

35601.

Milk shall be produced from nonreacting tuberculin and brucellosis tested cows or goats and shall conform to the regulations adopted by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 771.)
-------------------------------------------

35602.

Milk shall be obtained by the complete milking of healthy cows or goats which are properly fed and kept. Milk shall not be obtained or used for human consumption within 15 days prior to or 5 days after parturition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35603.

Milk which has been produced or handled in an insanitary dairy farm or milk products plant or other insanitary place or which has been handled in an insanitary manner is unfit for human consumption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cream [35631. - 35631.]

35631.

Cream shall be fresh and clean. It shall contain not less than 18 percent of milk fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Market Milk and Cream [35751. - 36123.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [35751. - 35757.]

35751.

This division does not prohibit the addition of vitamins and minerals to market milk or the sale of market milk to which any vitamins and minerals have been added if such milk is labeled to show the addition of the vitamins and minerals.
